Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 5
T

HE GREAT PARK AUTHORITY

12-3-390 through 12-3-397.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1980, p. 328, § 8, effective July 1, 1983.

Editor's notes.

- Part 5 of Chapter 3 of Title 12 was based on Ga. L. 1980, p. 328.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141,

§

12/HB 79, reserved the designation of this part, effective April 24, 2013.